Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DEMOLITION AND SITE RESTORATION.new text end new text begin $25,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities for demolition and removal of obsolete and underutilized buildings and infrastructure and restoration of the vacant sites to reduce operations, maintenance, and capital renewal costs on Minnesota State Colleges and Universities campuses. new text end